Nebraska, session 109, LB1220.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1220 LB1220
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 37-314, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
37-314 (1) The commission shall may, in accordance with the Game
Law, other provisions of law, and lawful rules and regulations, fix,
prescribe, and publish rules and regulations regarding the methods or
type, kind, and specifications of hunting, fur-harvesting, or fishing
gear used in the taking of any game, game fish, nongame fish, game
animals, fur-bearing animals, or game birds. Such rules and regulations
may be amended, modified, or repealed from time to time and shall be
based upon investigation and available but reliable data relative to such
limitations and standards.
(2) The commission may, in accordance with the Game Law, other
provisions of law, and lawful rules and regulations, pass and publish
commission orders regarding (a) conservation orders authorized by the
United States Fish and Wildlife Service, (b) open seasons and closed
seasons, either permanent or temporary, (c) bag limits, including the
age, sex, species, or area of the state in which any game, game fish,
nongame fish, game animals, fur-bearing animals, or game birds may be
taken, or (d) the taking of any particular kinds, species, or sizes of
game, game fish, nongame fish, game animals, fur-bearing animals, and
game birds in any designated waters or areas of this state. The
commission may pass such commission orders after due investigation and
having due regard to the distribution, abundance, economic value,
breeding habits, migratory habits, and causes of depletion or
extermination of the same in such designated waters or areas and having
due regard to the volume of the hunting, fur harvesting, and fishing
practiced therein and the climatic, seasonal, and other conditions
affecting the protection, preservation, and propagation of the same in
such waters or areas. The commission orders may be amended, modified, or
repealed from time to time. Commission orders shall be based upon
investigation and available but reliable data relative to such
-2-

LB1220 LB1220
2026 2026
limitations and standards.
(3) The commission shall hold at least one public hearing in
accordance with section 37-104 on each proposed commission order or
amendment, modification, or repeal of a commission order and shall hold
at least one public hearing in accordance with section 37-104, in
addition to all other requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act,
on each proposed rule and regulation or amendment, modification, or
repeal of a rule or regulation. The commission shall give notice of such
hearing to the public at least thirty days prior to the hearing by
posting it on the commission's website. No commission order shall be
valid against any person until fifteen days after such order has been
posted on the commission's website. Each rule, regulation, amendment,
modification, and repeal shall specify the date when it shall become
effective and while it remains in effect shall have the force and effect
of law.
(4) Regardless of the provisions of this section or of other
provisions of the Game Law which empower the commission to set seasons on
game birds, fish, or animals or provide the means and method by which
such seasons are set or promulgated and regardless of the provisions of
the Administrative Procedure Act, the commission may close or reopen any
open season previously set on game birds, fish, or animals in all or any
specific portion of the state. The commission shall only close or reopen
such seasons by majority vote at a valid special meeting called under
section 37-104 and other provisions of statutes regarding the holding of
public meetings. Any closing or reopening of an open season previously
set by the commission shall not be effective for at least twenty-four
hours after such action by the commission. The commission shall make
every effort to make available to all forms of the news media the
information on any opening or closing of any open season on game birds,
fish, or animals previously set. The commission may only use this special
provision allowing the commission to open or close game bird, fish, or
-3-

LB1220 LB1220
2026 2026
animal seasons previously set in emergency situations in which the
continuation of the open season would result in grave danger to human
life or property or to bird, fish, or wild animal populations. The
commission may also close or reopen any season established by a
conservation order under the same provisions pertaining to closing and
reopening seasons in this section.
(5) Any person violating the rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated or commission orders passed pursuant to this section shall be
guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and shall be fined at least one hundred
dollars upon conviction.
Sec. 2. Original section 37-314, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-4-